Missouri, session 2026, HB2920.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 34, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 34.750, to read as follows:
34.750. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Ammunition", a loaded cartridge or shot shell case, primer, projectile,
wadding, or propellant powder with or without a projectile;
(2) "Company", a for-profit organization, association, corporation, partnership,
joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited liability
company, including a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent
company, or affiliate of those entities or associations that exists to make a profit, not
including a sole proprietorship;
(3) "Discriminate", refusing to engage in the trade of any goods or services with
an entity or association based solely on its status as a firearm entity or firearm trade
association, refraining from continuing an existing business relationship with the entity
or association based solely on its status as a firearm entity or firearm trade association,
or terminating an existing business relationship with the entity or association based
solely on its status as a firearm entity or firearm trade association. This term shall not
include when the established policies of a merchant, retail seller, or platform restrict or
prohibit the listing or selling of ammunition, firearms, or firearm accessories or when a
company's refusal to engage in the trade of any goods or services, decision to refrain
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2920 2
from continuing an existing business relationship, or decision to terminate an existing
business relationship is to comply with federal, state, or local law, policy, or regulation
or a directive by a regulatory agency or for any traditional business reason that is
specific to the customer or potential customer and not based solely on an entity's or
association's status as a firearm entity or firearm trade association. As used in this
subdivision, the term "status as a firearm entity or firearm trade association" includes
the provision of lawful products and services by, and the lawful practices of, firearm
entities and firearm trade associations;
(4) "Firearm", a weapon that expels a projectile by the action of explosive or
expanding gases;
(5) "Firearm accessory", a device specifically designed or adapted to enable an
individual to wear, carry, store, or mount a firearm on the individual or on a conveyance
and an item used in conjunction with or mounted on a firearm that is not essential to the
basic function of the firearm. This term includes a detachable firearm magazine;
(6) "Firearm entity", a firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition
manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, supplier, retailer, or a sport shooting range;
(7) "Firearm trade association", any person, corporation, unincorporated
association, federation, business league, or business organization that:
(a) Is not organized or operated for profit and for which none of its net earnings
inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual;
(b) Has two or more firearm entities as members; and
(c) Is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(a) of the United
States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as an organization described by Section 501(c) of
that code;
(8) "Public entity", as defined in section 34.600.
2. This section applies only to a contract that:
(1) Is between a public entity and a company with at least ten full-time
employees; and
(2) Has a value of at least one hundred thousand dollars that is paid wholly or
partly from public funds of the public entity.
3. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section, a public entity shall not
enter into a contract with a company for the purchase of goods or services unless the
contract contains a written verification from the company that it:
(1) Does not have a practice, policy, guidance, or directive that discriminates
against a firearm entity or firearm trade association; and
(2) Shall not discriminate during the term of the contract against a firearm
entity or firearm trade association.

HB 2920 3
4. This section shall not apply to a public entity that:
(1) Contracts with a sole-source provider; or
(2) Does not receive a bid from a company that is able to provide the written
verification required by subsection 3 of this section.
✔